Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3605
Proposed system; resolution of county board; contents; procedure; county board; duties.

At such time as the county board decides to construct or install a sewerage disposal system and plant or plants or decides to improve or extend an existing system, the county board shall formally adopt a resolution indicating its intent to proceed with such engineering studies and the development of such plans as are necessary to proceed with the development of the system. Such resolution shall specify the proposed location of the system and the area or areas which it will serve. The resolution shall specify what particular future needs of planned commercial or industrial users will be served by the development of the proposed system. Prior to adopting the resolution, the county board may conduct feasibility studies on sewerage system development and receive preliminary cost estimates on such development. At the discretion of the county board the resolution may, if such information is available, indicate the estimated cost of the development of the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants and the manner in which such system and plants will be financed. Following the adoption of the resolution, the county board shall require that appropriate engineering studies be conducted and that plans and specifications be prepared of the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants or improvement or extension of the existing system.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 5.